Utah statutes.
13-31-301.   Mold liens.
(1)  If a molder has possession of a mold belonging to a customer, the molder
has a lien on the mold for the balance due from the customer for:
(a)  work for the customer involving the mold; and
(b)  the value of all materials related to work described in Subsection
(1)(a).
(2) (a)  Prior to enforcing the lien, the molder shall deliver or send written
notice by registered mail to the last-known address of the customer notifying
the customer that the molder intends to enforce the lien.
(b)  The notice required by Subsection (2)(a) shall:
(i)  state that the lien is claimed for damages for failure to pay under a
contract for work for the customer involving the mold;
(ii)  include a demand for payment; and
(iii)  be accompanied by the written contract, if any, for the work performed
for the customer.
(3)  If the molder is not paid the amount due within 60 days from the day the
notice required by Subsection (2) is received by the customer, the molder may
sell the mold at a public auction in accordance with Section 13-31-302.
